Nevada, session 83, AB585.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 218D.150 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
218D.150 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
each:
(a) Incumbent member of the Assembly may request the
drafting of:
(1) Not more than [4] 3 legislative measures submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before 5 p.m. on August 1 preceding a
regular session;
(2) [Not more than 5 legislative measures] If information
which is sufficient in detail to allow for the complete drafting of or
a request to withdraw one or more requests made pursuant to
subparagraph (1) was submitted on or before December 10
preceding a regular session, a number of legislative measures
equal to the number for which sufficient detail for drafting or a
request to withdraw was submitted pursuant to subparagraph (1),
which must be submitted to the Legislative Counsel after August 1
but on or before 5 p.m. on December 10 preceding a regular session;
and
(3) Not more than 1 legislative measure submitted to the
Legislative Counsel after December 10 preceding a regular session
[has convened] but on or before 5 p.m. on the eighth day of the
regular session . [at 5 p.m.]
(b) Incumbent member of the Senate may request the drafting
of:
(1) Not more than [8] 6 legislative measures submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before 5 p.m. on August 1 preceding a
regular session;
(2) [Not more than 10 legislative measures] If information
which is sufficient in detail to allow for the complete drafting of or
a request to withdraw one or more requests made pursuant to
subparagraph (1) was submitted on or before December 10
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
preceding a regular session, a number of legislative measures
equal to the number for which sufficient detail for drafting or a
request to withdraw was submitted pursuant to subparagraph (1),
which must be submitted to the Legislative Counsel after August 1
but on or before 5 p.m. on December 10 preceding a regular session;
and
(3) Not more than 2 legislative measures submitted to the
Legislative Counsel after December 10 preceding a regular session
[has convened] but on or before 5 p.m. on the eighth day of the
regular session . [at 5 p.m.]
(c) Newly elected member of the Assembly may request the
drafting of:
(1) Not more than [5] 3 legislative measures submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before December 10 preceding a regular
session; and
(2) Not more than 1 legislative measure submitted to the
Legislative Counsel after December 10 preceding a regular session
[has convened] but on or before 5 p.m. on the eighth day of the
regular session . [at 5 p.m.]
(d) Newly elected member of the Senate may request the
drafting of:
(1) Not more than [10] 6 legislative measures submitted to
the Legislative Counsel on or before December 10 preceding a
regular session; and
(2) Not more than 2 legislative measures submitted to the
Legislative Counsel after December 10 preceding a regular session
[has convened] but on or before 5 p.m. on the eighth day of the
regular session . [at 5 p.m.]
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, on or before
the first day of a regular session, each:
(a) Incumbent member of the Assembly must:
(1) Prefile at least 4 of the legislative measures that he or she
requested pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and (2) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 1; or
(2) Inform the Legislative Counsel of which 4 legislative
measures that he or she requested pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and
(2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 that he or she withdraws.
 If an incumbent member of the Assembly does not request the
maximum number of legislative measures authorized by
subparagraphs (1) and (2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1, the
number of legislative measures that he or she must prefile or
withdraw pursuant to this paragraph is reduced by that number of
unused requests.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(b) Incumbent member of the Senate must:
(1) Prefile at least 8 of the legislative measures that he or she
requested pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and (2) of paragraph (b) of
subsection 1; or
(2) Inform the Legislative Counsel of which 8 legislative
measures that he or she requested pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and
(2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 that he or she withdraws.
 If an incumbent member of the Senate does not request the
maximum number of legislative measures authorized by
subparagraphs (1) and (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the
number of legislative measures that he or she must prefile or
withdraw pursuant to this paragraph is reduced by that number of
unused requests.
(c) Newly elected member of the Assembly must:
(1) Prefile at least 2 of the legislative measures that he or she
requested pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (c) of
subsection 1; or
(2) Inform the Legislative Counsel of which 2 legislative
measures that he or she requested pursuant to subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 that he or she withdraws.
 If a newly elected member of the Assembly does not request the
maximum number of legislative measures authorized by
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (c) of subsection 1, the number of
legislative measures that he or she must prefile or withdraw
pursuant to this paragraph is reduced by that number of unused
requests.
(d) Newly elected member of the Senate must:
(1) Prefile at least 4 of the legislative measures that he or she
requested pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (d) of
subsection 1; or
(2) Inform the Legislative Counsel of which 4 legislative
measures that he or she requested pursuant to subparagraph (1) of
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 that he or she withdraws.
 If a newly elected member of the Senate does not request the
maximum number of legislative measures authorized by
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (d) of subsection 1, the number of
legislative measures that he or she must prefile or withdraw
pursuant to this paragraph is reduced by that number of unused
requests.
3. A Legislator may not request the drafting of a legislative
measure pursuant to subsection 1 on or after the date on which the
Legislator becomes a nonreturning Legislator. For the purposes of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
this subsection, “nonreturning Legislator” means a Legislator who,
in the year that the Legislator’s term of office expires:
(a) Has not filed a declaration of candidacy within the time
allowed for filing for election as a member of the Senate or the
Assembly;
(b) Has failed to win nomination as a candidate for the Senate or
the Assembly at the primary election; or
(c) Has withdrawn as a candidate for the Senate or the
Assembly.
4. A Legislator may not request the drafting of a legislative
measure pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 1 on or after
the date on which the Legislator files a declaration of candidacy for
election to the House in which he or she is not currently a member.
If the Legislator is elected to the other House, any request that he or
she submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 1 before
filing his or her declaration of candidacy for election counts against
the applicable limitation set forth in paragraph (c) or (d) of
subsection 1 for the House in which the Legislator is a newly
elected member.
5. In addition to the number of requests authorized pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) The chair of each standing committee of the immediately
preceding regular session, or a person designated in the place of the
chair by the Speaker of the Assembly or the Majority Leader of the
Senate, may request before the date of the general election
preceding a regular session the drafting of not more than 1
legislative measure for introduction by the committee in a subject
within the jurisdiction of the committee for every 18 legislative
measures that were referred to the respective standing committee
during the immediately preceding regular session.
(b) A person designated after the general election as a chair of a
standing committee for the next regular session, or a person
designated in the place of a chair by the person designated as the
Speaker of the Assembly or the Majority Leader of the Senate for
the next regular session, may request on or before December 10
preceding that regular session the drafting of the remaining number
of the legislative measures allowed for the respective standing
committee that were not requested by the previous chair or designee.
6. Each request made pursuant to this section must be on a
form prescribed by the Legislative Counsel.
Sec. 2. NRS 218D.155 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.155 1. In addition to the number of requests authorized
pursuant to NRS 218D.150:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(a) The Speaker of the Assembly and the Majority Leader of the
Senate may each request before the date of the general election
preceding a regular session, without limitation, the drafting of not
more than [15] 10 legislative measures for that regular session.
(b) The Minority Leader of the Assembly and the Minority
Leader of the Senate may each request before the date of the general
election preceding a regular session, without limitation, the drafting
of not more than [10] 5 legislative measures for that regular session.
(c) A person designated after the general election as the Speaker
of the Assembly, the Majority Leader of the Senate, the Minority
Leader of the Assembly or the Minority Leader of the Senate for the
next regular session may request before the first day of that regular
session the drafting of the remaining number of the legislative
measures allowed for the respective officer that were not requested
by the previous officer.
2. The Legislative Counsel, the General Counsel, the Secretary
of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the Assembly may request
before or during a regular session, without limitation, the drafting of
as many legislative measures as are necessary or convenient for the
proper exercise of their duties.
Sec. 3. NRS 218D.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.175 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
for a regular session, the Governor or the Governor’s designated
representative may request the drafting of [not] :
(a) Not more than 110 legislative measures which have been
approved by the Governor or the Governor’s designated
representative on behalf of the officers, agencies, boards,
commissions, departments and other units of the Executive
Department [. The requests] , which must be submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before 5 p.m. on August 1 preceding the
regular session [.] ; and
(b) Not more than 5 legislative measures to propose the
Governor’s legislative agenda, which must be submitted to the
Legislative Counsel:
(1) If no gubernatorial election will be held before
commencement of the next regular session, on or before 5 p.m. on
August 1 preceding the regular session; and
(2) If a gubernatorial election will be held before
commencement of the next regular session, after the first Monday
in January preceding the regular session and on or before 5 p.m.
on the first day of the regular session.
2. The Governor or the Governor’s designated representative
may request at any time before or during a regular session, without
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
limitation, the drafting of as many legislative measures as are
necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS 288.400 to 288.630,
inclusive.
3. The Director of the Office of Finance may request on or
before the 19th day of a regular session, without limitation, the
drafting of as many legislative measures as are necessary to
implement the budget proposed by the Governor and to provide for
the fiscal management of the State. [In addition to the requests
otherwise authorized pursuant to this section, the Governor may
request the drafting of not more than 5 legislative measures on or
before the 19th day of a regular session to propose the Governor’s
legislative agenda.]
4. For a regular session, the following constitutional officers
may request, without the approval of the Governor or the
Governor’s designated representative, the drafting of not more than
the following numbers of legislative measures, which must be
submitted to the Legislative Counsel on or before 5 p.m. on
September 1 preceding the regular session:
Lieutenant Governor .......................................................... [3] 2
Secretary of State ............................................................... [6] 5
State Treasurer ................................................................... [5] 4
State Controller .................................................................. [5] 4
Attorney General ........................................................... [20] 16
5. In addition to the requests authorized by subsection 4, the
Secretary of State may request, without the approval of the
Governor or the Governor’s designated representative, the drafting
of not more than [2] 1 legislative [measures,] measure, which must
be submitted to the Legislative Counsel on or before 5 p.m. on
December 31 preceding the regular session.
6. Each request made pursuant to this section must be on a
form prescribed by the Legislative Counsel. The legislative
measures requested pursuant to [subsections] :
(a) Paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and subsection 4 must be
prefiled on or before the third Wednesday in November preceding
the regular session.
(b) Subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 must be
prefiled on or before the 10th calendar day preceding the regular
session.
(c) Subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 must be
introduced on or before the 15th day of the regular session.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
 A legislative measure that is not prefiled or introduced, as
applicable, on or before [that] the applicable day shall be deemed
withdrawn.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)